Massachusetts, session 194th, H5508.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 35 the
following 2 sections:-
Section 35A. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
otherwise requires, have the following meanings:
“Secretary”, the secretary of housing and livable communities.
“Program”, the veteran rental assistance bridge program.
(b) The secretary, in consultation with the secretary of veterans' services, shall establish a
veteran rental assistance bridge program to assist veterans experiencing: (i) increased housing
rents; (ii) living on fixed incomes, disability compensation or modest wages; (iii) long wait times
for receiving approved veteran federal housing vouchers; and (iv) eviction or homelessness in
the commonwealth.
of 4

(c) Eligibility for the program shall include veterans: (i) approved for a veteran federal
housing voucher but are waiting for issuance or lease-up; (ii) at imminent risk of eviction; (iii)
experiencing a sudden loss of income; and (iv) transitioning from homelessness or institutional
settings.
(d)(1) The program shall provide assistance in addressing obstacles to maintaining or
securing rental assistance for veterans and their families for housing with a household income: (i)
not more than 30 per cent of area median income who are homeless and moving into subsidized
or private housing or are at risk of becoming homeless; or (ii) more than 30 per cent but not more
than 50 per cent of area median income who are homeless and moving into subsidized or private
housing or are at risk of becoming homeless due to a significant reduction of income or increased
expenses.
(2) The program shall be administered by the local housing authorities in the city or town,
in consultation with the veteran service officer in the city or town.
(3) The program shall provide: (i) up to 24 months of temporary rental assistance; (ii) a
security deposit for a rental property; (iii) rental coverage for the first and last month rent for the
rental property; and (iv) flexible rental support to prevent eviction.
(e) The secretary shall coordinate with: (i) local veteran service officers; (ii) the housing
court department pursuant to chapter 185C; (iii) local housing continuums of care; and (iv)
emergency shelters in the commonwealth to best implement the program.
(f) The secretary shall establish for the program a designation to prioritize veterans who
are at risk of homelessness. Upon designation of a veteran as being at risk of homelessness, the
secretary shall: (i) expedite a rental assistance review of the veteran; (ii) require mandatory
of 4

mediation before the eviction of the veteran when possible; and (iii) rapidly refer the veteran to
stabilization services.
(g) Qualified nonprofit organizations as defined in section 35 that have contracted with
the secretary to establish veterans’ supportive housing pursuant to said section 35 shall receive
increased funding, prioritizing gateway cities and regions in the commonwealth with high
veteran housing instability, for: (i) developing additional veteran-designated supportive housing
units; (ii) veteran case management services; (iii) mental health support for veterans and their
families; (iv) veteran employment services; and (v) substance use recovery support for veterans.
(h) The secretary, in consultation with the secretary of veterans' services, shall prepare an
annual report on the costs and outcomes of the program including a comparison of the costs of
homelessness prevention to emergency shelter, hospital stays and long-term instability. The
annual report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the current status of veteran homelessness in
the commonwealth; (ii) wait times for veteran federal housing voucher activation for veterans’
housing; and (iii) cost savings from prevention versus emergency shelter placement. The annual
report shall be submitted, not later than December 31 of each year of the program, to the
governor, the lieutenant governor, the chairs of the joint committee on veterans and federal
affairs and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate.
(i) The secretary, in consultation with the secretary of veterans' services, shall promulgate
rules or regulations for the administration of the program.
Section 35B. (a) There shall be within the executive office of housing and livable
communities a Veteran Rental Assistance Bridge Program Fund. The fund shall be credited with:
(i) revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court and specifically
of 4

designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest earned on such revenue; and (iii) funds from
public and private sources and other gifts, grants and donations to encourage philanthropic
partnerships for the veterans’ housing, including, but not limited to, funds from governmental,
quasi-governmental, nonprofit organizations, for-profit organizations and individuals. Amounts
credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the
fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
(b) The secretary of housing and livable communities shall administer the fund consistent
with the requirements of the veteran rental assistance bridge program established in section 35A.
(c) Annually, not later than June 30, the secretary of housing and livable communities
shall report on all expenditures from the Veteran Rental Assistance Bridge Program Fund to: (i)
the chairs of the joint committee on housing: (ii) the chairs of the joint committee on veterans
and federal affairs; (iii) the house and senate committees on ways and means; and (iv) the clerks
of the house of representatives and senate.
of 4